cree.lexc
LEXICON Root
						Noun;
						Verb;
						VerbRoot;
	1sg+:ni%^			Stem;

LEXICON Stem
		Noun;
		Verb;
		VerbRoot;
		
LEXICON VerbRoot
	fut+:ka%^			Verb;

LEXICON Noun
    canoe:ciimaan       #;
    money:soonija       #;
    meat:wijaash        #;
    spoon:eemihkwaan    #;
    hat:astotin         #;
    pipe:ospwaakan      #;

LEXICON Verb
	count:akime			Suff;
	sit:api				Suff;
	rest:ispelohke		Suff;
	
LEXICON Suff
    +1s:%^n     		#;
    +2s:%^w      		#;
